Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.405.210

Conditions and contracts of employment—Determination of probable cause for nonrenewal of contracts—Nonrenewal due to enrollment decline or revenue loss—Notice—Opportunity for hearing.

(1) No teacher, principal, supervisor, superintendent, or other certificated employee, holding a position as such with a school district, hereinafter referred to as "employee," shall be employed except by written order of a majority of the directors of the district at a regular or special meeting thereof, nor unless he or she is the holder of an effective teacher's certificate or other certificate required by law or the Washington professional educator standards board for the position for which the employee is employed.

(2)(a) The board shall make with each employee employed by it a written contract, which shall be in conformity with the laws of this state, and except as otherwise provided by law and under (b) of this subsection, limited to a term of not more than one year. Every such contract shall be made in duplicate, one copy to be retained by the school district superintendent or secretary and one copy to be delivered to the employee. No contract shall be offered by any board for the employment of any employee who has previously signed an employment contract for that same term in another school district of the state of Washington unless such employee shall have been released from his or her obligations under such previous contract by the board of directors of the school district to which he or she was obligated. Any contract signed in violation of this provision shall be void.

(b) A written contract made by a board with a principal under (a) of this subsection may be for a term of up to three years if the principal has: (i) Been employed as a principal for three or more consecutive years; (ii) been recommended by the superintendent as a candidate for a two or three-year contract because the principal has demonstrated the ability to stabilize instructional practices and received a comprehensive performance rating of level 3 or above in their most recent comprehensive performance evaluation under RCW 28A.405.100; and (iii) met the school district's requirements for satisfying an updated record check under RCW 28A.400.303. A written contract made by a board with a principal under (a) of this subsection for a term of three years may not be renewed before the final year of the contract.

(3) In the event it is determined that there is probable cause or causes that the employment contract of an employee should not be renewed by the district for the next ensuing term such employee shall be notified in writing on or before May 15th preceding the commencement of such term of that determination, or if the omnibus appropriations act has not passed the legislature by the end of the regular legislative session for that year, then notification shall be no later than June 15th, which notification shall specify the cause or causes for nonrenewal of contract. Such determination of probable cause for certificated employees, other than the superintendent, shall be made by the superintendent. Such notice shall be served upon the employee personally, or by certified or registered mail, or by leaving a copy of the notice at the house of his or her usual abode with some person of suitable age and discretion then resident therein. Every such employee so notified, at his or her request made in writing and filed with the president, chair or secretary of the board of directors of the district within 10 days after receiving such notice, shall be granted opportunity for hearing pursuant to RCW 28A.405.310 to determine whether there is sufficient cause or causes for nonrenewal of contract: PROVIDED, That any employee receiving notice of nonrenewal of contract due to an enrollment decline or loss of revenue may, in his or her request for a hearing, stipulate that initiation of the arrangements for a hearing officer as provided for by RCW 28A.405.310(4) shall occur within 10 days following July 15 rather than the day that the employee submits the request for a hearing. If any such notification or opportunity for hearing is not timely given, the employee entitled thereto shall be conclusively presumed to have been reemployed by the district for the next ensuing term upon contractual terms identical with those which would have prevailed if his or her employment had actually been renewed by the board of directors for such ensuing term.

(4) This section shall not be applicable to "provisional employees" as so designated in RCW 28A.405.220; transfer to a subordinate certificated position as that procedure is set forth in RCW 28A.405.230 or 28A.405.245 shall not be construed as a nonrenewal of contract for the purposes of this section.

[ 2023 c 362 s 1; 2016 c 85 s 1; 2010 c 235 s 303; 2009 c 57 s 1; 2005 c 497 s 216; 1996 c 201 s 1; 1990 c 33 s 390. Prior: 1983 c 83 s 1; 1983 c 56 s 11; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 114 s 4; 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 133; 1973 c 49 s 2; 1970 ex.s. c 15 s 16; prior: 1969 ex.s. c 176 s 143; 1969 ex.s. c 34 s 12; 1969 ex.s. c 15 s 2; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.67.070; prior: 1961 c 241 s 1; 1955 c 68 s 3; prior: (i) 1909 c 97 p 307 s 5; 1897 c 118 s 55; 1891 c 127 s 14; 1890 p 369 s 37; 1886 p 18 s 47; Code 1881 s 3200; RRS s 4851. (ii) 1943 c 52 s 1, part; 1941 c 179 s 1, part; 1939 c 131 s 1, part; 1925 ex.s. c 57 s 1, part; 1919 c 89 s 3, part; 1915 c 44 s 1, part; 1909 c 97 p 285 s 2, part; 1907 c 240 s 5, part; 1903 c 104 s 17, part; 1901 c 41 s 3, part; 1897 c 118 s 40, part; 1890 p 364 s 26, part; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 4776, part. Formerly RCW 28A.67.070, 28.67.070.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2016 c 85: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [March 31, 2016]." [ 2016 c 85 s 6.]

Finding—2010 c 235: See note following RCW 28A.405.245.

Effective date—2009 c 57: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [April 10, 2009]." [ 2009 c 57 s 5.]

Intent—Part headings not law—Effective date—2005 c 497: See notes following RCW 28A.305.011.

Severability—1983 c 56: See note following RCW 28A.195.010.

Savings—Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 114: See notes following RCW 28A.400.010.

Severability—1970 ex.s. c 15: See note following RCW 28A.230.160.

Rights preserved—Severability—1969 ex.s. c 176: See notes following RCW 28A.310.010.

Minimum criteria for the evaluation of certificated employees—Four-level rating evaluation system—Procedures—Steering committee—Implementation—Reports—Comprehensive performance evaluation: RCW 28A.405.100.

School superintendent—RCW 28A.405.210 not applicable to contract renewal: RCW 28A.400.010.